Massachusetts, session 194th, H2354.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence of the second paragraph
the following sentence:-
Nor shall any zoning ordinance or by-law prohibit, regulate or restrict the use of land or
structures dedicated in whole or in part to periodic operation of an agricultural fair, provided that
such land or structures are owned and such agricultural fair is operated by a nonprofit
corporation established for such purpose, and further provided that any use of such land or
structures is in furtherance of such nonprofit corporation’s purpose.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1